Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-152
Domestic company; refusal of another state or country to license; retaliatory action.

Whenever it appears to the Director of Insurance that permission to transact business within any state of the United States or within any foreign country is refused to a company organized under the laws of this state after a certificate of compliance has been issued to the company by the director and after such company has complied with all laws of such state or foreign country, then and in every such case the director may forthwith cancel the authority of every company organized under the laws of such state or foreign government licensed to do business in this state and may refuse a certificate of authority to every such company thereafter applying to him or her for authority to do business in this state until his or her certificate has been duly recognized by the government of such state or country.

Laws 1937, c. 100, § 1, p. 350;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-217;

R.S.1943, § 44-152;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 39.